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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC C 1246 / 46 Master Cylinder Pressure Sensor
Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1246 /46

Eitherof the following 1.,2.,3.,4.or5. isdetected:
1.At thevehiclespeedof7km/h (4mph)ormore,ECU

terminal PMC voltage becomes more than 0.86 V and
thecondition that0.0 1 Vor lessdoesnotchangecon-
tinues for 30 sec.

2. Interference occurs to ECU terminal PMC 7 times or
more for 5 sec.

3.ECUterminalSTP isOFF,and thecondition that termi-
nalPMCvoltagebecomesmore than0.86Vor less than
0.3 V continues for 5 sec. or more.

4.Thecondition thatECUterminal IG 1 voltage is9.5V to
17.0V,and terminalVCMvoltageother than the range
from4.4V to5.6Vcontinues for 1.2sec.ormore.

5. The condition that ECU terminal VCM voltage is 4.4 V to
5.6 V, and terminal PMC voltage other than the range
from0. 14Vto4.85Vcontinues for 1.2sec.ormore.

SMastercylinderpressuresensor
SMastercylinderpressuresensorcircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the master cylinder pressure sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid
relay and prohibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Start the inspection fromstep 1 incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnot
using thehand −held tester.

1 Checkoutputvalueof themastercylinderpressuresensor.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that thebrake fluidpressurevalueof themastercylinderpressuresensordisplayedon thehand −held
tester is changing when depressing the brake pedal.
OK:

Brake fluid pressure value must be changing.

OK Go to step 4.

NG

2 Check master cylinder pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Install LSPV gauge to the front caliper bleeder plug por-

tion, and bleed LSPV gauge.
SST09709 −29018

(b) Remove air cleaner inlet and battery clamp cover.
CHECK:
Start the engine and depress the brake pedal, then check the
relation between the fluid pressure and voltage of PMC and E2
terminalsof themastercylinderpressuresensorwithconnector
still connected.
OK:

Front brake caliper fluid pressure Voltage

0kPa(0Kgf/cm
2
,0psi) 0.37 − 0.63V

5,883kPa(60kgf/cm
2
,853psi) 1.57 − 1.83V

11,768kPa( 120kgf/cm
2

, 1,706psi) 2.77 − 3.03V

HINT:
Voltageofbetween terminalsVCMandE2:4.7 − 5.3V

NG Replace master cylinder pressure sensor.

OK
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3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between master cyl-
inder pressure sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

4 Check whether or not the ECU terminal STP input voltage is changed when the
stop light switch is turned on and off.

NO Check the stop light switch circuit (See Pub. No.
RM731EonpageDI −82).

YES

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


